Virginia statutes. Title 45.2. Mines, Minerals, and Energy.
Article 7. Mine Inspections.

§ 45.2-1148.
Frequency of mine inspections.

The Director shall conduct a complete inspection of each underground mineral mine at least every 180 days, and of any surface mineral mine that is not inspected by MSHA at least once per year. An additional inspection of such mineral mine shall be made when deemed appropriate by the Director based on an evaluation of risks at such mine or if requested by miners employed at a mine or the licensed operator of a mine.

The Director shall not conduct an inspection of a surface mineral mine that is inspected by MSHA; however, a mine inspector or other employee of the Department may enter such mine in order to (i) respond to a complaint of a violation of the Act; (ii) respond to and investigate any serious personal injury or death; and (iii) with the consent of the licensed operator, conduct training programs.

The Director shall determine whether a particular surface mineral mine is inspected by MSHA. The Director shall make such determination based on information provided by MSHA and Department records.

The Director shall request representatives of MSHA to serve with Department personnel on a joint committee of cooperation. The committee shall include the Director of the Division and such additional Division employees as the Director designates. The committee shall meet at least twice annually at the call of the Director for the purpose of facilitating communication and resolving discrepancies regarding the inspection responsibilities of state and federal agencies with respect to surface mineral mines in the Commonwealth.

History.

1997, c. 390, § 45.1-161.292:54; 1998, c. 695; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2021.

§ 45.2-1149.
Evaluation of risks at mines.

For the purpose of allocating the resources of the Department that are to be used for conducting additional inspections, the Department shall develop a procedural policy for scheduling such inspections based on an assessment, to be made at least annually, of the comparative risks at each underground mineral mine and at any surface mineral mine that is not inspected by MSHA. Such policy shall be prepared with the assistance of working groups consisting of persons knowledgeable in mine safety issues. The issuance of such policy shall be exempt from Article 2 (§

2.2-4006

et seq.) of the Administrative Process Act. Variables that shall be included in the risk assessment measures include (i) fatality and serious accident rates at the mine, (ii) the rates of issuance of closure orders and notices of violations of the mine safety laws of the Commonwealth at the mine, and (iii) the frequency rates for nonserious accidents or nonfatal days lost. Risk assessments shall be developed for both independent contractors and individual mine sites.

The Director shall schedule additional inspections at each underground mineral mine, and at each surface mineral mine that is not inspected by MSHA, based on the rating assigned to it reflecting the assessment of its risks compared to other such mines in the Commonwealth.

History.

1997, c. 390, § 45.1-161.292:55; 1998, c. 695; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2021.

§ 45.2-1150.
Review of inspection reports and records.

Prior to completing an inspection of an underground mineral mine, a mine inspector shall review the most recent available report of inspection by MSHA. Prior to completing any inspection of a mine, a mine inspector shall comprehensively review the records of pre-shift examinations, on-shift exams, daily inspections, weekly examinations, and other records relating to safety and health conditions in the mine that are required to be maintained pursuant to the Act, for the 30-day period preceding the inspection. The mine inspector may, but shall not be required to, review the records for such additional period as he may deem prudent.

History.

1997, c. 390, § 45.1-161.292:56; 1998, c. 695; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2021.

§ 45.2-1151.
Advance notice of inspections; confidentiality of trade secrets.

No person shall give advance notice of any mine inspection conducted under the provisions of this title without authorization from the Director.

All information that is reported to or otherwise obtained by the Director or his authorized representative in connection with any inspection or proceeding under this title and that contains or might reveal a trade secret referred to in 18 U.S.C. § 1905 shall be considered confidential for the purpose of that section, except that such information may be disclosed to the Director or his authorized representative concerned with carrying out any provision of this title or any proceeding hereunder. In any such proceeding, the court or the Director shall issue any order appropriate to protect the confidentiality of trade secrets.

History.

1997, c. 390, § 45.1-161.292:57; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2021.

§ 45.2-1152.
Scheduling of mine inspections.

The Director shall schedule the inspections of mines under this article, to the extent deemed reasonable and prudent, in order to reduce their chronological proximity to inspections conducted by MSHA. To this end, the Director shall endeavor to coordinate the timing of inspections with MSHA personnel.

The Director and mine inspectors, to the extent deemed reasonable and prudent, shall schedule mine inspections to commence at a variety of hours of the day and days of the week, including evening and night shifts, weekends, and holidays.

History.

1997, c. 390, § 45.1-161.292:58; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2021.

§ 45.2-1153.
Denial of entry.

No person shall deny the Director or any mine inspector entry upon or through a mine for the purpose of conducting an inspection or into any office at the site where maps or records relating to the mine are located, pursuant to the Act.

History.

1997, c. 390, § 45.1-161.292:59; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2021.

§ 45.2-1154.
Duties of operator.

Each operator of a mine, or his agent, shall furnish to the Director and each mine inspector proper facilities for entering such mine and making examinations or obtaining information and shall furnish any data or information not of a confidential nature requested by such inspector.

Each operator of an underground mine, or his agent, shall provide each mine inspector adequate means for transportation to the active working areas of the mine within a reasonable time following the mine inspector’s arrival at the mine.

Such operator or agent shall, when ordered to do so by a mine inspector during the course of an inspection, promptly clear the mine or section thereof of all persons.

History.

1997, c. 390, § 45.1-161.292:60; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2021.

§ 45.2-1155.
Duties of inspectors.

During a complete inspection of any mine, other than an inactive mine, the mine inspector shall inspect, where applicable, the surface plant; all active workings; all active travel ways; entrances to abandoned areas; accessible worked-out areas; at least one entry of each intake and return airway in its entirety; escapeways and other places where miners work or travel or where hazardous conditions might exist; electric installations and equipment; haulage facilities; first aid equipment; ventilation facilities; communication installations; roof and rib conditions; roof-support practices; blasting practices; haulage practices and equipment; and any other condition, practice, or equipment pertaining to the health and safety of the miners. The mine inspector shall make tests for the quantity of air flows, and for oxygen deficiency and gas, in each place that he is required to inspect in an underground mine.

In a mine that operates more than one shift in a 24-hour period, the mine inspector shall devote sufficient time on the second and third shifts to determine conditions and practices relating to the health and safety of the miners. For an inactive mine, the mine inspector shall inspect all areas of the mine where persons might work or travel during the period the mine is an inactive mine.

The inspector shall make a personal examination of (i) the interior of each mine inspected and (ii) the outside of such mine where any danger to the miners might exist.

History.

1997, c. 390, § 45.1-161.292:61; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2021.

§ 45.2-1156.
Certificates of inspection.

Upon completing a mine inspection, each mine inspector shall complete a certificate of inspection. Such certificate of inspection shall show the date of inspection, the condition in which the mine was found, a statement regarding any violation of this chapter or Chapter 14 (§

45.2-1400

et seq.) or 15 (§

45.2-1500

et seq.) discovered during the inspection, the progress made in the improvement of the mine as such progress relates to health and safety, the numbers of accidents and injuries occurring in and about the mine since the previous inspection, and all other facts and information of public interest concerning the condition of the mine as are useful and proper.

The mine inspector shall deliver one copy of the certificate of inspection to the licensed operator, agent, or mine foreman and one copy to the employees’ safety committee, where applicable, and shall post copies at one or more prominent places on the premises where they can be read conveniently by the miners.

The Department shall provide access to certificates of inspection of underground mineral mines to MSHA.

History.

1997, c. 390, § 45.1-161.292:62; 1998, c. 695; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2021.